Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.250

Penalty—Abatement.

Whoever is convicted of erecting, causing or contriving a public or common nuisance as described in this chapter, or at common law, when the same has not been modified or repealed by statute, where no other punishment therefor is specially provided, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars, and the court with or without such fine, may order such nuisance to be abated, and issue a warrant as hereinafter provided: PROVIDED, That orders and warrants of abatement shall not be issued by district judges.

[ 1987 c 202 s 136; 1957 c 45 s 1; Code 1881 s 1248; 1875 p 81 s 14; RRS s 9925.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.